Florida, session 2026, SB532.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 52 53 Section 1.âSubsections (2) and (3), paragraph (a) of 54 subsection (5), paragraph (a) of subsection (9), paragraph (b) 55 of subsection (11), paragraph (a) of subsection (14), paragraph 56 (a) of subsection (15), subsection (17), paragraph (a) of 57 subsection (18), subsection (19), paragraph (a) of subsection 58 (20), paragraph (a) of subsection (21), and subsection (26) of 59 section 28.24, Florida Statutes, are amended, and subsection 60 (30) is added to that section, to read: 61 28.24âService charges.âThe clerk of the circuit court shall 62 charge for services rendered manually or electronically by the 63 clerkâs office in recording documents and instruments and in 64 performing other specified duties. These charges may not exceed 65 those specified in this section, except as provided in s. 66 28.345. 67 (2)âFor examining, comparing, correcting, verifying, and 68 certifying transcripts of record in appellate proceedings, 69 prepared by attorney for appellant or someone else other than 70 clerk, per page: 6.00 5.00, from which the clerk shall remit 71 0.50 per page to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 72 General Revenue Fund. 73 (3)âFor preparing, numbering, and indexing an original 74 record of appellate proceedings, per instrument: 4.00 3.50, from 75 which the clerk shall remit 0.50 per instrument to the 76 Department of Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 77 (5)(a)âFor verifying any instrument presented for 78 certification prepared by someone other than clerk, per page: 79 4.00 3.50, from which the clerk shall remit 0.50 per page to the 80 Department of Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 81 (9)(a)âFor writing any paper that is a court record other 82 than a paper otherwise specifically mentioned in this section, 83 including signing and sealing: 8.00 7.00, from which the clerk 84 shall remit 1.00 to the Department of Revenue for deposit into 85 the General Revenue Fund. 86 (11)âFor receiving money into the registry of court: 87 (b)âEminent domain actions, per deposit: 200.00 170.00, 88 from which the clerk shall remit 20.00 per deposit to the 89 Department of Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 90 (14)(a)âOath, administering, attesting, and sealing of 91 court records not otherwise provided for in this section: 4.00 92 3.50, from which the clerk shall remit 0.50 to the Department of 93 Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 94 (15)(a)âFor validating certificates or any authorized bonds 95 that are court records, each: 4.00 3.50, from which the clerk 96 shall remit 0.50 each to the Department of Revenue for deposit 97 into the General Revenue Fund. 98 (17)âFor exemplified certificates, including the signing 99 and sealing of them: 8.00 7.00, from which the clerk shall remit 100 1.00 to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the General 101 Revenue Fund. 102 (18)(a)âFor authenticated certificates that are court 103 records, including the signing and sealing of them: 8.00 7.00, 104 from which the clerk shall remit 1.00 to the Department of 105 Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 106 (19)(a)âFor issuing and filing a subpoena for a witness, 107 not otherwise provided for in this section, including the 108 writing, preparing, signing, and sealing of it: 8.00 7.00, from 109 which the clerk shall remit 1.00 to the Department of Revenue 110 for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 111 (b)âFor signing and sealing only: 3.00 2.00, from which the 112 clerk shall remit 0.50 to the Department of Revenue for deposit 113 into the General Revenue Fund. 114 (20)(a)âFor approving a court bond: 10.00 8.50, from which 115 the clerk shall remit 1.00 to the Department of Revenue for 116 deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 117 (21)(a)âFor searching court records, for each yearâs 118 search: 3.00 2.00, from which the clerk shall remit 0.50 for 119 each yearâs search to the Department of Revenue for deposit into 120 the General Revenue Fund. 121 (26)âFor sealing any court file or expungement of any 122 record: 50.00 42.00, from which the clerk shall remit 4.50 to 123 the Department of Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue 124 Fund. 125 (30)âBy January 1, 2030, and every 3 years thereafter, the 126 Office of Economic and Demographic Research shall prepare a 127 report that includes recommendations for increasing the service 128 charges in this section according to the percentage change in 129 the Consumer Price Index. The service charges must be rounded to 130 the nearest $1. The Office of Economic and Demographic Research 131 shall submit the report to the President of the Senate and the 132 Speaker of the House of Representatives before the start of the 133 next regularly scheduled session of the Legislature. 134 Section 2.âParagraphs (a), (c), (d), and (g) of subsection 135 (1) of section 28.2401, Florida Statutes, are amended, and 136 subsection (5) is added to that section, to read: 137 28.2401âService charges and filing fees in probate 138 matters.â 139 (1)âExcept when otherwise provided, the clerk may impose 140 service charges or filing fees for the following services or 141 filings, not to exceed the following amounts: 142 (a)âFee for the opening of any estate of one document or 143 more, including, but not limited to, petitions and orders to 144 approve settlement of minorâs claims; to open a safe-deposit 145 box; to enter rooms and places; for the determination of heirs, 146 if not formal administration; and for a foreign guardian to 147 manage property of a nonresident; but not to include issuance of 148 letters or order of summary administration.............$275 $230 149 (c)âFee for petition and order to admit foreign wills, 150 authenticated copies, exemplified copies, or transcript to 151 record................................................ $275 $230 152 (d)âFee for disposition of personal property without 153 administration.........................................$275 $230 154 (g)âFee for formal administration, guardianship, ancillary, 155 curatorship, or conservatorship proceedings............$470 $395 156 157 The clerk shall remit $115 of each filing fee collected under 158 paragraphs (a), (c)-(i), and (k) to the Department of Revenue 159 for deposit into the State Courts Revenue Trust Fund. 160 (5)âBy January 1, 2030, and every 3 years thereafter, the 161 Office of Economic and Demographic Research shall prepare a 162 report that includes recommendations for increasing the filing 163 fees in this section according to the percentage change in the 164 Consumer Price Index. The filing fees must be rounded to the 165 nearest $5. The Office of Economic and Demographic Research 166 shall submit the report to the President of the Senate and the 167 Speaker of the House of Representatives before the start of the 168 next regularly scheduled session of the Legislature. 169 Section 3.âPresent subsection (7) of section 28.241, 170 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (8), a new 171 subsection (7) is added to that section, and subsections (1) and 172 (2) of that section are amended, to read: 173 28.241âFiling fees for trial and appellate proceedings.â 174 (1)âFiling fees are due at the time a party files a 175 pleading to initiate a proceeding or files a pleading for 176 relief. Reopen fees are due at the time a party files a pleading 177 to reopen a proceeding if at least 90 days have elapsed since 178 the filing of a final order or final judgment with the clerk. If 179 a fee is not paid upon the filing of the pleading as required 180 under this section, the clerk must shall pursue collection of 181 the fee pursuant to s. 28.246. 182 (a)1.a.âExcept as provided in sub-subparagraph b. and 183 subparagraph 2., the party instituting any civil action, suit, 184 or proceeding in the circuit court must shall pay to the clerk 185 of that court a filing fee of up to $460 $395 in all cases in 186 which there are not more than five defendants and an additional 187 filing fee of up to $5 $2.50, from which the clerk shall remit 188 $0.50 to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the General 189 Revenue Fund, for each defendant in excess of five. Of the first 190 $200 in filing fees, $195 must be remitted to the Department of 191 Revenue for deposit into the State Courts Revenue Trust Fund, $4 192 must be remitted to the Department of Revenue for deposit into 193 the Administrative Trust Fund within the Department of Financial 194 Services and used to fund the contract with the Florida Clerks 195 of Court Operations Corporation created in s. 28.35, and $1 must 196 be remitted to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 197 Administrative Trust Fund within the Department of Financial 198 Services to fund audits of individual clerksâ court-related 199 expenditures conducted by the Department of Financial Services. 200 b.âThe party instituting any civil action, suit, or 201 proceeding in the circuit court under chapter 39, chapter 61, 202 chapter 741, chapter 742, chapter 747, chapter 752, or chapter 203 753 shall pay to the clerk of that court a filing fee of up to 204 $345 $295 in all cases in which there are not more than five 205 defendants and an additional filing fee of up to $5 $2.50 for 206 each defendant in excess of five. Of the first $100 in filing 207 fees, $95 must be remitted to the Department of Revenue for 208 deposit into the State Courts Revenue Trust Fund, $4 must be 209 remitted to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 210 Administrative Trust Fund within the Department of Financial 211 Services and used to fund the contract with the Florida Clerks 212 of Court Operations Corporation created in s. 28.35, and $1 must 213 be remitted to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 214 Administrative Trust Fund within the Department of Financial 215 Services to fund audits of individual clerksâ court-related 216 expenditures conducted by the Department of Financial Services. 217 c.âAn additional filing fee of $5 $4 shall be paid to the 218 clerk. The clerk shall remit $3.50 to the Department of Revenue 219 for deposit into the Court Education Trust Fund and shall remit 220 $1.50 50 cents to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 221 Administrative Trust Fund within the Department of Financial 222 Services to fund clerk education provided by the Florida Clerks 223 of Court Operations Corporation. An additional filing fee of up 224 to $18 must shall be paid by the party seeking each severance 225 that is granted, from which the clerk shall remit $3 to the 226 Department of Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 227 The clerk may impose an additional filing fee of up to $85, from 228 which the clerk shall remit $10 to the Department of Revenue for 229 deposit into the General Revenue Fund, for all proceedings of 230 garnishment, attachment, replevin, and distress. Postal charges 231 incurred by the clerk of the circuit court in making service by 232 certified or registered mail on defendants or other parties must 233 shall be paid by the party at whose instance service is made. 234 Additional fees, charges, or costs may not be added to the 235 filing fees imposed under this section, except as authorized in 236 this section or by general law. 237 2.a.âNotwithstanding the fees prescribed in subparagraph 238 1., a party instituting a civil action in circuit court relating 239 to real property or mortgage foreclosure must shall pay a 240 graduated filing fee based on the value of the claim. 241 b.âA party must shall estimate in writing the amount in 242 controversy of the claim upon filing the action. For purposes of 243 this subparagraph, the value of a mortgage foreclosure action is 244 based upon the principal due on the note secured by the 245 mortgage, plus interest owed on the note and any moneys advanced 246 by the lender for property taxes, insurance, and other advances 247 secured by the mortgage, at the time of filing the foreclosure. 248 The value must shall also include the value of any tax 249 certificates related to the property. In stating the value of a 250 mortgage foreclosure claim, a party must shall declare in 251 writing the total value of the claim, as well as the individual 252 elements of the value as prescribed in this sub-subparagraph. 253 c.âIn its order providing for the final disposition of the 254 matter, the court shall identify the actual value of the claim. 255 The clerk must shall adjust the filing fee if there is a 256 difference between the estimated amount in controversy and the 257 actual value of the claim and collect any additional filing fee 258 owed or provide a refund of excess filing fee paid. 259 d.âThe party must shall pay a filing fee of: 260 (I)âFour hundred and seventy Three hundred and ninety-five 261 dollars in all cases in which the value of the claim is $50,000 262 or less and in which there are not more than five defendants. 263 The party must shall pay an additional filing fee of up to $5 264 $2.50 for each defendant in excess of five. Of the first $200 in 265 filing fees, $195 must be remitted by the clerk to the 266 Department of Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund, 267 $4 must be remitted to the Department of Revenue for deposit 268 into the Administrative Trust Fund within the Department of 269 Financial Services and used to fund the contract with the 270 Florida Clerks of Court Operations Corporation created in s. 271 28.35, and $1 must be remitted to the Department of Revenue for 272 deposit into the Administrative Trust Fund within the Department 273 of Financial Services to fund audits of individual clerksâ 274 court-related expenditures conducted by the Department of 275 Financial Services; 276 (II)âOne thousand and seventy Nine hundred dollars in all 277 cases in which the value of the claim is more than $50,000 but 278 less than $250,000 and in which there are not more than five 279 defendants. The party must shall pay an additional filing fee of 280 up to $5 $2.50 for each defendant in excess of five. Of the 281 first $355 in filing fees, $350 must be remitted by the clerk to 282 the Department of Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue 283 Fund, $4 must be remitted to the Department of Revenue for 284 deposit into the Administrative Trust Fund within the Department 285 of Financial Services and used to fund the contract with the 286 Florida Clerks of Court Operations Corporation created in s. 287 28.35, and $1 must be remitted to the Department of Revenue for 288 deposit into the Administrative Trust Fund within the Department 289 of Financial Services to fund audits of individual clerksâ 290 court-related expenditures conducted by the Department of 291 Financial Services; or 292 (III)âTwo thousand two hundred and sixty One thousand nine 293 hundred dollars in all cases in which the value of the claim is 294 $250,000 or more and in which there are not more than five 295 defendants. The party must shall pay an additional filing fee of 296 up to $5 $2.50 for each defendant in excess of five. Of the 297 first $1,705 in filing fees, $930 must be remitted by the clerk 298 to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the General 299 Revenue Fund, $770 must be remitted to the Department of Revenue 300 for deposit into the State Courts Revenue Trust Fund, $4 must be 301 remitted to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 302 Administrative Trust Fund within the Department of Financial 303 Services to fund the contract with the Florida Clerks of Court 304 Operations Corporation created in s. 28.35, and $1 must be 305 remitted to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 306 Administrative Trust Fund within the Department of Financial 307 Services to fund audits of individual clerksâ court-related 308 expenditures conducted by the Department of Financial Services. 309 e.âAn additional filing fee of $5 must $4 shall be paid to 310 the clerk. The clerk shall remit $3.50 to the Department of 311 Revenue for deposit into the Court Education Trust Fund and 312 shall remit $1.50 50 cents to the Department of Revenue for 313 deposit into the Administrative Trust Fund within the Department 314 of Financial Services to fund clerk education provided by the 315 Florida Clerks of Court Operations Corporation. An additional 316 filing fee of up to $18 must shall be paid by the party seeking 317 each severance that is granted. The clerk may impose an 318 additional filing fee of up to $85 for all proceedings of 319 garnishment, attachment, replevin, and distress. Postal charges 320 incurred by the clerk of the circuit court in making service by 321 certified or registered mail on defendants or other parties must 322 shall be paid by the party at whose instance service is made. 323 Additional fees, charges, or costs may not be added to the 324 filing fees imposed under this section, except as authorized in 325 this section or by general law. 326 (b)âA party reopening any civil action, suit, or proceeding 327 in the circuit court must shall pay to the clerk of court a 328 filing fee set by the clerk in an amount not to exceed $60 $50. 329 For purposes of this section, a case is reopened after all 330 appeals have been exhausted or time to file an appeal from a 331 final order or final judgment has expired. A reopen fee may be 332 assessed by the clerk for any motion filed by any party at least 333 90 days after a final order or final judgment has been filed 334 with the clerk in the initial case. A reservation of 335 jurisdiction by a court does not cause a case to remain open for 336 purposes of this section or exempt a party from paying a reopen 337 fee. A party is exempt from paying the fee for any of the 338 following: 339 1.âA writ of garnishment; 340 2.âA writ of replevin; 341 3.âA distress writ; 342 4.âA writ of attachment; 343 5.âA motion for rehearing filed within 10 days; 344 6.âA motion for attorneyâs fees filed within 30 days after 345 entry of a judgment or final order; 346 7.âA motion for dismissal filed after a mediation agreement 347 has been filed; 348 8.âA disposition of personal property without 349 administration; 350 9.âAny probate case prior to the discharge of a personal 351 representative; 352 10.âAny guardianship pleading prior to discharge; 353 11.âAny mental health pleading; 354 12.âMotions to withdraw by attorneys; 355 13.âMotions exclusively for the enforcement of child 356 support orders; 357 14.âA petition for credit of child support; 358 15.âA Notice of Intent to Relocate and any order issuing as 359 a result of an uncontested relocation; 360 16.âStipulations and motions to enforce stipulations; 361 17.âResponsive pleadings; 362 18.âCases in which there is no initial filing fee; or 363 19.âMotions for contempt. 364 (c)1.âA party in addition to a party described in sub 365 subparagraph (a)1.a. who files a pleading in an original civil 366 action in circuit court for affirmative relief by cross-claim, 367 counterclaim, counterpetition, or third-party complaint must 368 shall pay the clerk of court a fee of $470 $395. A party in 369 addition to a party described in sub-subparagraph (a)1.b. who 370 files a pleading in an original civil action in circuit court 371 for affirmative relief by cross-claim, counterclaim, 372 counterpetition, or third-party complaint must shall pay the 373 clerk of court a fee of $350 $295. The clerk shall deposit the 374 fee into the fine and forfeiture fund established pursuant to s. 375 142.01. 376 2.âA party in addition to a party described in subparagraph 377 (a)2. who files a pleading in an original civil action in 378 circuit court for affirmative relief by cross-claim, 379 counterclaim, counterpetition, or third-party complaint must 380 shall pay the clerk of court a graduated fee of: 381 a.âFour hundred and seventy Three hundred and ninety-five 382 dollars in all cases in which the value of the pleading is 383 $50,000 or less; 384 b.âOne thousand and seventy Nine hundred dollars in all 385 cases in which the value of the pleading is more than $50,000 386 but less than $250,000; or 387 c.âTwo thousand two hundred sixty One thousand nine hundred 388 dollars in all cases in which the value of the pleading is 389 $250,000 or more. 390 391 The clerk shall deposit the fees collected under this 392 subparagraph into the fine and forfeiture fund established 393 pursuant to s. 142.01. 394 (d)âThe clerk of court shall collect a service charge of 395 $15 $10 for issuing an original, a certified copy, or an 396 electronic certified copy of a summons, which the clerk shall 397 deposit into the fine and forfeiture fund established pursuant 398 to s. 142.01. The clerk shall assess the fee against the party 399 seeking to have the summons issued. 400 (2)âUpon the institution of any appellate proceeding from 401 any lower court to the circuit court of any such county, 402 including appeals filed by a county or municipality as provided 403 in s. 34.041(5), or from the county or circuit court to an 404 appellate court of the state, the clerk shall charge and collect 405 from the party or parties instituting such appellate proceedings 406 a filing fee, as follows: 407 (a)âFor filing a notice of appeal from the county court to 408 the circuit court, a filing fee not to exceed $280. 409 (b)âFor filing a notice of appeal from the county or 410 circuit court to the district court of appeal or to the Supreme 411 Court, in addition to the filing fee required under s. 25.241 or 412 s. 35.22, a filing fee not to exceed $115 $100, of which the 413 clerk shall remit $20 to the Department of Revenue for deposit 414 into the General Revenue Fund. If the party is determined to be 415 indigent, the clerk must shall defer payment of the fee 416 otherwise required by this subsection. 417 (7)âBy January 1, 2030, and every 3 years thereafter, the 418 Office of Economic and Demographic Research shall prepare a 419 report that includes recommendations for increasing the filing 420 fees and service charges in this section according to the 421 percentage change in the Consumer Price Index. The filing fees 422 and service charges must be rounded to the nearest $5. The 423 Office of Economic and Demographic Research shall submit the 424 report to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the 425 House of Representatives before the start of the next regularly 426 scheduled session of the Legislature. 427 Section 4.âParagraphs (a), (b), (d), and (e) of subsection 428 (1) and subsection (2) of section 34.041, Florida Statutes, are 429 amended and subsection (9) is added to that section, to read: 430 34.041âFiling fees.â 431 (1)(a)âFiling fees are due at the time a party files a 432 pleading to initiate a proceeding or files a pleading for 433 relief. Reopen fees are due at the time a party files a pleading 434 to reopen a proceeding if at least 90 days have elapsed since 435 the filing of a final order or final judgment with the clerk. If 436 a fee is not paid upon the filing of the pleading as required 437 under this section, the clerk must shall pursue collection of 438 the fee pursuant to s. 28.246. Upon the institution of any civil 439 action, suit, or proceeding in county court, the party must 440 shall pay the following filing fee, not to exceed: 441 1.âFor all claims less than $100.....................$50. 442 2.âFor all claims of $100 or more but not more than $50 443 ............................................................$75. 444 3.âFor all claims of more than $500 but not more than 445 $2,500: $170, from which the clerk shall remit $20 to the 446 Department of Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 447 4.âFor all claims of more than $2,500 but not more than 448 $15,000....................................................$295. 449 5.âFor all claims more than $15,000............$460 $395. 450 6.âIn addition, for all proceedings of garnishment, 451 attachment, replevin, and distress: $85, from which the clerk 452 shall remit $10 to the Department of Revenue for deposit into 453 the General Revenue Fund. 454 7.âNotwithstanding subparagraphs 3. and 6., for all claims 455 of not more than $1,000 filed simultaneously with an action for 456 replevin of property that is the subject of the claim......$125. 457 8.âFor removal of tenant action.....................$180. 458 459 The filing fee in subparagraph 7. is the total fee due under 460 this paragraph for that type of filing, and no other filing fee 461 under this paragraph may be assessed against such a filing. 462 (b)âThe first $15 of the filing fee collected under 463 subparagraph (a)4. and the first $10 of the filing fee collected 464 under subparagraph (a)8. must shall be deposited in the State 465 Courts Revenue Trust Fund. By the 10th day of each month, the 466 clerk shall submit that portion of the fees collected in the 467 previous month which is in excess of one-twelfth of the clerkâs 468 total budget for the performance of court-related functions to 469 the Department of Revenue for deposit into the Clerks of the 470 Court Trust Fund. An additional filing fee of $5 must $4 shall 471 be paid to the clerk. The clerk shall transfer $3.50 to the 472 Department of Revenue for deposit into the Court Education Trust 473 Fund and shall transfer $1.50 50 cents to the Department of 474 Revenue for deposit into the Administrative Trust Fund within 475 the Department of Financial Services to fund clerk education 476 provided by the Florida Clerks of Court Operations Corporation. 477 Postal charges incurred by the clerk of the county court in 478 making service by mail on defendants or other parties must shall 479 be paid by the party at whose instance service is made. Except 480 as provided in this section, filing fees and service charges for 481 performing duties of the clerk relating to the county court are 482 shall be as provided in ss. 28.24 and 28.241. Except as 483 otherwise provided in this section, all filing fees must shall 484 be retained as fee income of the office of the clerk of the 485 circuit court. Filing fees imposed by this section may not be 486 added to any penalty imposed by chapter 316 or chapter 318. 487 (d)âThe clerk of court shall collect a service charge of 488 $15 $10 for issuing a summons or an electronic certified copy of 489 a summons, which the clerk shall deposit into the fine and 490 forfeiture fund established pursuant to s. 142.01. The clerk 491 shall assess the fee against the party seeking to have the 492 summons issued. 493 (e)âOf the first $200 in filing fees payable under 494 subparagraph (a)5., $195 must be remitted to the Department of 495 Revenue for deposit into the State Courts Revenue Trust Fund, $4 496 must be remitted to the Department of Revenue for deposit into 497 the Administrative Trust Fund within the Department of Financial 498 Services and used to fund the contract with the Florida Clerks 499 of Court Operations Corporation created in s. 28.35, and $1 must 500 be remitted to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 501 Administrative Trust Fund within the Department of Financial 502 Services to fund audits of individual clerksâ court-related 503 expenditures conducted by the Department of Financial Services. 504 By the 10th day of each month, the clerk shall submit that 505 portion of the filing fees collected pursuant to this subsection 506 in the previous month which is in excess of one-twelfth of the 507 clerkâs total budget to the Department of Revenue for deposit 508 into the Clerks of the Court Trust Fund. 509 (2)âA party reopening any civil action, suit, or proceeding 510 in the county court must shall pay to the clerk of court a 511 filing fee set by the clerk in an amount not to exceed $30 $25 512 for all claims of not more than $500 and an amount not to exceed 513 $60 $50 for all claims of more than $500. For purposes of this 514 section, a case is reopened after all appeals have been 515 exhausted, or time to file an appeal from a final order or final 516 judgment has expired. A reopen fee may be assessed by the clerk 517 for any motion filed by any party at least 90 days after a final 518 order or final judgment has been filed with the clerk in the 519 initial case. A reservation of jurisdiction by a court does not 520 cause a case to remain open for purposes of this section or 521 exempt a party from paying a reopen fee. A party is exempt from 522 paying the fee for any of the following: 523 (a)âA writ of garnishment; 524 (b)âA writ of replevin; 525 (c)âA distress writ; 526 (d)âA writ of attachment; 527 (e)âA motion for rehearing filed within 10 days; 528 (f)âA motion for attorneyâs fees filed within 30 days of 529 the entry of the judgment or final order; 530 (g)âA motion for dismissal filed after a mediation 531 agreement has been filed; 532 (h)âA motion to withdraw by attorneys; 533 (i)âStipulations and motions to enforce stipulations; 534 (j)âResponsive pleadings; or 535 (k)âMotions for contempt. 536 (9)âBy January 1, 2030, and every 3 years thereafter, the 537 Office of Economic and Demographic Research shall prepare a 538 report that includes recommendations for increasing the filing 539 fees and service charges in this section according to the 540 percentage change in the Consumer Price Index. The filing fees 541 and service charges must be rounded to the nearest $5. The 542 Office of Economic and Demographic Research shall submit the 543 report to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the 544 House of Representatives before the start of the next regularly 545 scheduled session of the Legislature. 546 Section 5.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 547 45.035, Florida Statutes, is amended and subsection (4) is added 548 to that section, to read: 549 45.035âClerkâs fees.âIn addition to other fees or service 550 charges authorized by law, the clerk shall receive service 551 charges related to the judicial sales procedure set forth in ss. 552 45.031-45.033 and this section: 553 (2)âIf there is a surplus resulting from the sale, the 554 clerk may receive the following service charges, which shall be 555 deducted from the surplus: 556 (b)âThe clerk is entitled to a service charge of $20 $15 557 for each disbursement of surplus proceeds, from which the clerk 558 shall remit $5 to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 559 General Revenue Fund. 560 (4)âBy January 1, 2030, and every 3 years thereafter, the 561 Office of Economic and Demographic Research shall prepare a 562 report that includes recommendations for increasing the service 563 charges in this section according to the percentage change in 564 the Consumer Price Index. The service charges must be rounded to 565 the nearest $5. The Office of Economic and Demographic Research 566 shall submit the report to the President of the Senate and the 567 Speaker of the House of Representatives before the start of the 568 next regularly scheduled session of the Legislature. 569 Section 6.âSubsection (3) of section 721.83, Florida 570 Statutes, is amended, to read: 571 721.83âConsolidation of judicial foreclosure actions.â 572 (3)(a)âA consolidated timeshare foreclosure action is shall 573 be considered a single action, suit, or proceeding for the 574 payment of filing fees and service charges pursuant to general 575 law. In addition to the payment of such filing fees and service 576 charges, an additional filing fee of up to $15 $10, from which 577 the clerk shall remit $5 to the Department of Revenue for 578 deposit into the General Revenue Fund, for each timeshare 579 interest joined in that action must shall be paid to the clerk 580 of court. 581 (b)âBy January 1, 2030, and every 3 years thereafter, the 582 Office of Economic and Demographic Research shall prepare a 583 report that includes recommendations for increasing the filing 584 fees in this section according to the percentage change in the 585 Consumer Price Index. The filing fees must be rounded to the 586 nearest $5. The Office of Economic and Demographic Research 587 shall submit the report to the President of the Senate and the 588 Speaker of the House of Representatives before the start of the 589 next regularly scheduled session of the Legislature. 590 Section 7.âPresent subsection (5) of section 744.3678, 591 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (6), a new 592 subsection (5) is added to that section, and subsection (4) of 593 that section is amended, to read: 594 744.3678âAnnual accounting.â 595 (4)âThe guardian shall pay from the wardâs estate to the 596 clerk of the circuit court a fee based upon the following 597 graduated fee schedule, upon the filing of the annual financial 598 return, for the auditing of the return: 599 (a)âFor estates with a value of $25,000 or less the clerk 600 of the court may charge a fee of up to $25 $20, from which the 601 clerk shall remit $5 to the Department of Revenue for deposit 602 into the General Revenue Fund. 603 (b)âFor estates with a value of more than $25,000 up to and 604 including $100,000 the clerk of the court may charge a fee of up 605 to $100 $85, from which the clerk shall remit $10 to the 606 Department of Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 607 (c)âFor estates with a value of more than $100,000 up to 608 and including $500,000 the clerk of the court may charge a fee 609 of up to $200 $170, from which the clerk shall remit $20 to the 610 Department of Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 611 (d)âFor estates with a value in excess of $500,000 the 612 clerk of the court may charge a fee of up to $295 $250, from 613 which the clerk shall remit $25 to the Department of Revenue for 614 deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 615 616 Upon petition by the guardian, the court may waive the auditing 617 fee upon a showing of insufficient funds in the wardâs estate. 618 Any guardian unable to pay the auditing fee may petition the 619 court for a waiver of the fee. The court may waive the fee after 620 it has reviewed the documentation filed by the guardian in 621 support of the waiver. 622 (5)âBy January 1, 2030, and every 3 years thereafter, the 623 Office of Economic and Demographic Research shall prepare a 624 report that includes recommendations for increasing the fees in 625 this section according to the percentage change in the Consumer 626 Price Index. The fees must be rounded to the nearest $5. The 627 Office of Economic and Demographic Research shall submit the 628 report to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the 629 House of Representatives before the start of the next regularly 630 scheduled session of the Legislature. 631 Section 8.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.